en: Baby Bathtubs & Bath Seats
xx: Baby Bathtubs & Bath Seats
cs: Dětské vaničky
da: Babybadekar og badestole
de: Babybadewannen
es: Bañeras y asientos de baño para bebés
fr: Baignoires pour bébés et sièges de bain, Siège de bain
it: Vaschette da bagno
ja: ベビーバス
nl: Babybadjes
no: Babybadekar og badestoler
pl: Wanny i krzesełka kąpielowe dla niemowląt
pt: Banheiras para bebês
ru: Детские ванночки и сидения для ванн
sv: Bebisbadkar och badsäten
tr: Bebek Küvetleri ve Banyo Tabureleri

en: Shower Visors
xx: Shower Visors
cs: Clony do sprchy
da: Brusebeskyttelse
de: Shampoo-Schutzschilder
es: Viseras de ducha
fr: Casquettes pour le bain
it: Cappellini doccia
ja: シャンプーハット
nl: Douchecaps
no: Dusjskjerm
pl: Daszki pod prysznic
pt: Visores de chuveiro
ru: Детские козырьки для душа
sv: Schamposkydd
tr: Banyo Şapkaları

en: Baby Gift Sets
xx: Baby Gift Sets
cs: Dárkové sady pro děti a batolata
da: Baby og småbørn – gavesæt
de: Geschenksets für Babys
es: Conjuntos de regalo para bebés
fr: Coffrets cadeaux pour bébés
it: Set da regalo per neonato e primi passi
ja: ベビーギフトセット
nl: Geschenkensets voor baby's en peuters
no: Gavesett til baby
pl: Zestawy prezentów dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Conjuntos de presentes para bebês e crianças de colo
ru: Наборы подарков для младенцев
sv: Bebispresentset
tr: Bebek Hediyesi Takımları

en: Baby Health
xx: Baby Health
cs: Péče o děti a kojence
da: Babysundhed
de: Baby Gesundheitsbedarf
es: Salud del bebé
fr: Puériculture
it: Salute del bambino
ja: ベビー用健康・衛生用品
nl: Gezondheidszorg voor baby's
no: Babyhelse
pl: Zdrowie niemowląt
pt: Saúde do bebê
ru: Товары для здоровья младенцев
sv: Bebishälsovård
tr: Bebek Sağlığı

en: Baby Health & Grooming Kits
xx: Baby Health & Grooming Kits
cs: Sady pomůcek pro péči o děti
da: Babysundhed og plejesæt
de: Baby-Gesundheits- & Pflegesets
es: Kits de salud y aseo del bebé
fr: Kits pour la santé et la toilette des bébés
it: Kit per la salute e la cura del bambino
ja: ベビー用ヘルスケアキット
nl: Producten voor de (medische) verzorging van baby's
no: Sett for babyhelse og stell
pl: Zestawy do pielęgnacji niemowląt
pt: Kits para saúde e cuidados do bebê
ru: Наборы для ухода за детьми
sv: Vård- och hälsovårdskit för bebisar
tr: Bebek Sağlığı ve Bakım Setleri

en: Nasal Aspirators
xx: Nasal Aspirators
cs: Nosní odsávačky
da: Næsesuger
de: Nasensauger
es: Aspiradores nasales
fr: Mouche-bébés
it: Aspiratori nasali
ja: 鼻吸い器
nl: Neusaspirators
no: Neseaspiratorer
pl: Aspiratory do nosa
pt: Aspiradores nasais
ru: Носовые  аспираторы
sv: Nässugar
tr: Burun Aspiratörleri

en: Pacifier Clips & Holders
xx: Pacifier Clips & Holders
cs: Skřipce a držáky na dudlík
da: Suttekæder og sutteholdere
de: Schnullerclips & -ketten
es: Clips y fundas para chupetes
fr: Attache-sucettes
it: Clip e pinze per ciuccio
ja: おしゃぶりクリップ・おしゃぶりホルダー
nl: Speenclips en -houders
no: Smokkstropper og -holdere
pl: Klipsy i uchwyty do smoczków
pt: Porta-chupetas
ru: Держатели и зажимы для сосок
sv: Napphållare och clips
tr: Emzik Klips ve Tutucuları

en: Pacifier Wipes
xx: Pacifier Wipes
cs: Ubrousky na dudlíky
da: Sutteservietter
de: Reinigungstücher für Schnuller
es: Toallitas para chupetes
fr: Lingettes nettoyantes pour sucettes et tétines
it: Salviettine per ciucci
ja: おしゃぶり用除菌シート
nl: Schoonmaakdoekjes voor spenen
no: Våtservietter for smokker
pl: Chusteczki do smoczków
pt: Lenços umedecidos para chupetas
ru: Салфетки для сосок
sv: Våtservetter för nappar
tr: Bebek Emziği Mendilleri

en: Pacifiers & Teethers
xx: Pacifiers & Teethers
cs: Dudlíky a kousadla
da: Sutter og bideringe
de: Schnuller & Beißringe
es: Chupetes y mordedores
fr: Sucettes et anneaux de dentition
it: Ciucci e massaggiagengive
ja: おしゃぶり・はがため
nl: Fopspenen en bijtringen
no: Smokker og biteringer
pl: Smoczki i gryzaki
pt: Chupetas e mordedores
ru: Соски-пустышки и зубные кольца
sv: Nappar och bitringar
tr: Emzikler ve Diş Kaşıyıcılar

en: Baby Safety
xx: Baby Safety
cs: Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí
da: Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr
de: Babysicherheit
es: Protección para el bebé
fr: Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés
it: Sicurezza dei bebè
ja: ベビー用安全グッズ
nl: Babyveiligheid
no: Babysikkerhet
pl: Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt
pt: Segurança de bebês
ru: Товары для обеспечения безопасности детей
sv: Bebissäkerhet
tr: Bebek Güvenliği

en: Baby & Pet Gate Accessories
xx: Baby & Pet Gate Accessories
cs: Bezpečnostní zábrany – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til sikkerhedslåge for børn og kæledyr
de: Zubehör für Baby- & Haustierschutzgitter
es: Accesorios para puertas de seguridad
fr: Accessoires pour barrières de sécurité
it: Accessori per cancelletti di sicurezza
ja: セーフティゲート関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor beveiligingshekken
no: Tilbehør til baby- og kjæledyrporter
pl: Akcesoria do bramek ochronnych dla dzieci i zwierząt
pt: Acessórios para grades de segurança
ru: Принадлежности для барьеров для детей и домашних животных
sv: Tillbehör till barn- och djurgrindar
tr: Bebek ve Evcil Hayvan Kapısı Aksesuarları

en: Baby & Pet Gates
xx: Baby & Pet Gates
cs: Bezpečnostní zábrany
da: Børne- og kæledyrsgitter
de: Baby- & Haustierschutzgitter
es: Puertas para niños y mascotas
fr: Barrières de sécurité
it: Cancelletti di sicurezza
ja: セーフティゲート
nl: Beveiligingshekken
no: Baby- og kjæledyrporter
pl: Bramki ochronne dla dzieci i zwierząt
pt: Grades de segurança para bebês e animais de estimação
ru: Калитки для детей и домашних животных
sv: Bebis- och djurgrindar
tr: Bebek ve Evcil Hayvan Kapıları

en: Baby Monitors
xx: Baby Monitors
cs: Dětské monitory
da: Babyalarmer
de: Babyfone
es: Interfonos para bebés
fr: Écoute-bébés
it: Interfoni per interni
ja: ベビーモニター
nl: Babyfoons
no: Babyovervåkningsutstyr
pl: Nianie elektroniczne
pt: Monitores de bebês
ru: Детские мониторы
sv: Babyvakter
tr: Bebek İzleme Cihazları

en: Baby Safety Harnesses & Leashes
xx: Baby Safety Harnesses & Leashes
cs: Bezpečnostní popruhy a řemínky pro děti
da: Babyseler og -snore
de: Babysicherheitsgurte & -leinen
es: Correas y arneses de seguridad para bebés
fr: Harnais de sécurité pour enfants
it: Imbracature/guinzagli sicurezza bebè
ja: 迷子防止リュック・ハーネス
nl: Veiligheidstuigjes en -banden voor baby's
no: Sikkerhetsseler og bånd for baby
pl: Szelki i smycze dla dzieci
pt: Arnêses e guias de segurança para bebês
ru: Детские поводки
sv: Säkerhetsselar och koppel för barn
tr: Bebek Güvenlik Kayışları

en: Baby Safety Locks & Guards
xx: Baby Safety Locks & Guards
cs: Dětské pojistky
da: Børnesikring
de: Babysicherungen & Schutzvorrichtungen
es: Protectores y cierres de seguridad
fr: Verrous et accessoires de sécurité pour bébés
it: Blocchi di sicurezza per bambini
ja: ベビーガード・チャイルドロック
nl: Veiligheidssloten voor baby's
no: Sikkerhetslåser og beskyttere for baby
pl: Blokady i zabezpieczenia przed dziećmi
pt: Travas e dispositivos de segurança para bebês
ru: Детские замки и защитные устройства
sv: Barnsäkerhetslås och skydd
tr: Bebek Emniyet Kilitleri ve Muhafazaları

en: Baby Safety Rails
xx: Baby Safety Rails
cs: Dětská zábradlí
da: Sengeheste
de: Baby-Schutzleisten
es: Barandillas de seguridad
fr: Barrières de lit pour bébés
it: Barriere letto per bambini
ja: ベビーベッド用サイドレール
nl: Veiligheidsrails voor baby's
no: Sikkerhetsrekkverk for baby
pl: Barierki do łóżek dziecięcych
pt: Grades de segurança para bebês
ru: Детские защитные перила
sv: Säkerhetsspjälor
tr: Bebek Güvenlik Çitleri

en: Baby Toys & Activity Equipment
xx: Baby Toys & Activity Equipment
cs: Dětské hračky
da: Babylegetøj
de: Babyspielwaren
es: Juguetes y actividades para bebés
fr: Jouets pour bébés et équipement d'éveil
it: Attrezzature per attività e giochi per bebè
ja: ベビー向けおもちゃ
nl: Babyspeelgoed
no: Babyleker og aktivitetsutstyr
pl: Zabawki dla niemowląt
pt: Brinquedos para bebês
ru: Детские игрушки
sv: Bebisleksaker och aktivitetsutrustning
tr: Bebek Oyuncakları ve Aktivite Gereçleri

en: Alphabet Toys
xx: Alphabet Toys
cs: Hračky s abecedou
da: Bogstavlegetøj
de: ABC-Lernspielzeuge
es: Juegos para aprender el abecedario
fr: Jouets alphabet
it: Giochi con l'alfabeto
ja: アルファベットのおもちゃ
nl: Alfabetspeelgoed
no: Bokstavleker
pl: Zabawki z alfabetem
pt: Brinquedos alfabéticos
ru: Игрушки для изучения алфавита
sv: Bokstavsleksaker
tr: Alfabe Oyuncakları

en: Baby Activity Toys
xx: Baby Activity Toys
cs: Aktivní hračky pro batolata
da: Aktivitetslegetøj til babyer
de: Baby-Aktiv-Spielzeug
es: Juguetes de actividades para bebés
fr: Jouets d'éveil pour bébés
it: Giochi multiattività per bebè
ja: ベビー用アクティビティトイ
nl: Activiteitsspeelgoed voor baby's
no: Aktivitetsleker for babyer
pl: Zabawki interaktywne dla niemowląt
pt: Centros de atividades para bebês
ru: Развивающие игрушки для младенцев
sv: Aktivitetsleksaker för bebisar
tr: Bebekler için Aktivite Oyuncakları

en: Baby Bouncers & Rockers
xx: Baby Bouncers & Rockers
cs: Dětské sedačky
da: Hoppegynger og gyngeheste
de: Babywippen
es: Mecedoras y sillas para bebés
fr: Transats pour bébés
it: Sdraiette e dondoli per neonati
ja: ベビーバウンサー・ゆりかご
nl: Babystoeltjes
no: Babystoler og babyvugger
pl: Bujaczki i leżaki bujane dla niemowląt
pt: Cadeiras de balanço para bebês
ru: Детские кресла-качалки
sv: Babysitters
tr: Beşikler ve Sallanan Oyuncaklar